Georgia, session 2025_26, SB110.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 15-11-2 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to definitions
relative to the juvenile code, is amended by revising paragraph (48) and adding two new
paragraphs to read as follows:
"(6.1) 'Blatant disregard' means a real, significant, and imminent risk of harm that would
be so obvious to a legal custodian that a legal custodian acting reasonably would not have
S. B. 110
- 1 -

LC 49 2252S (SCS)
exposed the child to the imminent risk of harm without exercising precautionary
measures to protect the child from such harm."
"(37.1) 'Independent activity' means the activity of a child who is not under the direct
supervision of a legal custodian or person acting in loco parentis and shall include, but
shall not be limited to, playing indoors or outdoors alone or with other children, walking
to or from school, running errands, or traveling to local commercial or recreational
facilities."
"(48) 'Neglect' means:
(A) The failure to provide proper necessary parental care or control, subsistence,
education as required by law, or other care or control necessary for a child's physical,
mental, or emotional health or morals safety;
(B) The failure to provide a child with adequate supervision necessary for such child's
well-being health or safety due to a legal custodian having placed the child in a
situation that requires judgment or actions beyond such child's level of maturity,
physical abilities, or mental abilities and thereby creating a real, significant, and
imminent risk of harm to the child as a result of a blatant disregard for such legal
custodian's responsibilities; or
(C) The abandonment of a child by his or her parent, guardian, or legal custodian;
provided, however, that such term shall not include a legal custodian permitting a child
to engage in one or more independent activities, only if the legal custodian reasonably
believes the child is of sufficient maturity, physical abilities, and mental abilities to avoid
substantial risk of harm."
SECTION 2.
Code Section 16-5-60 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to reckless conduct
causing harm to or endangering the bodily safety of another and conduct by HIV infected
persons, is amended by revising subsection (b) as follows:
S. B. 110
- 2 -

LC 49 2252S (SCS)
"(b)(1) As used in this subsection, the terms 'independent activity,' 'legal custodian,' and
'neglect' shall have the same meaning as provided in Code Section 15-11-2.
(2) A person who causes bodily harm to or endangers the bodily safety of another person
by consciously disregarding a substantial and unjustifiable risk that his or her act or
omission will cause harm or endanger the safety of the other person and the disregard
constitutes a gross deviation from the standard of care which a reasonable person would
exercise in the situation is guilty of a misdemeanor; provided, however, that it shall not
be a violation of this subsection for a legal custodian to permit a child to engage in one
or more independent activities unless doing so constitutes neglect."
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025; provided, however, that Section 2 of this
Act shall apply to offenses committed on or after such date.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 110
- 3 -